Missouri, session 2026, HB2797.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 9.417, to read as follows:
9.417. April ninth each year is hereby designated as "Clyde S. Cahill, Jr. Day" in
Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
and activities to honor the former senior judge of the United States Court for the
Eastern District of Missouri. Cahill's illustrious legal career also included service on the
bench of the twenty-second circuit court, as the chief legal advisor for the NAACP, and
as a regional attorney for the United States Office of Economic Opportunity in Kansas
City.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.